District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

34-1315.01

Applicability.

Repealed.

May 3, 2014, D.C. Law 20-102, § 501, 61 DCR 1882
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 7010, 61 DCR 9990
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 7010 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 7010 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 7010 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884).